Montana, session 2025, HB918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Olmstead plan -- quarterly reporting. During the interim following the 69th legislative
session, the department of public health and human services shall provide a report to the health and human
services budget committee at each committee meeting on the department's efforts to develop a plan to
implement the United States supreme court's decision in Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999), pursuant to
section 1, Chapter 554, Laws of 2023.
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 3. Termination. [This act] terminates September 15, 2026.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 918
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 918, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 918
INTRODUCED BY J. GILLETTE
AN ACT IMPLEMENTING THE PROVISIONS OF THE GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS ACT; REQUIRING THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES TO REPORT ON THE DEVELOPMENT AND
IMPLEMENTATION OF A PLAN TO COMPLY WITH THE PRINCIPLES OF THE OLMSTEAD DECISION; AND
PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”